Illinois, session 104th, SB1697.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Carbon Dioxide Transportation and 5Sequestration Act is amended by adding Section 22 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 75/22 new)7    Sec. 22. Compensation for damages to the surface. 8    (a) An affected landowner is entitled to reasonable 9compensation from an applicant who has been granted a 10certificate of authority under this Act for damages resulting 11from access to the landowner's property for required 12activities taken to construct the pipeline, including, but not 13limited to, the following:14        (1) compensation for damage to growing crops, trees, 15    shrubs, fences, roads, structures, improvements, personal 16    property, and livestock thereon and compensation for the 17    loss of the value of a commercial crop impacted by 18    pipeline installation; the value of the crop shall be 19    calculated based on local market price by:20            (A) determining the average per acre yield for the 21        same crop on comparable adjacent acreage;22            (B) determining the price received for the sale of 23        the same crop on comparable adjacent acreage;  SB1697 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1            (C) determining the acreage of the area impacted 2        by pipeline activities and applying the determined 3        price; and4            (D) making an initial determination of the value 5        of the crop, which shall be determined by the affected 6        landowner and submitted to the applicant who has been 7        granted a certificate of authority under this Act;8        (2) compensation to return the surface estate, 9    including soil conservation practices, such as terraces, 10    grassed waterways, and other conservation practices, to 11    the condition of the surface prior to accessing the 12    property;13        (3) compensation for damage to the productive 14    capability of the soil resulting from compaction or 15    rutting if the parties are incapable of reaching 16    resolution for such issues under the mitigation agreement 17    detailed in paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Section 20. 18    An applicant shall not access a property where excessively 19    wet soil conditions would not allow normal farming 20    operations due to increased risk of soil erosion, rutting, 21    or compaction. The Department of Agriculture may 22    temporarily halt construction or any other activities on a 23    proposed pipeline upon a finding of an applicant's 24    noncompliance with this paragraph. If there is a dispute 25    between the applicant who has been granted a certificate 26    of authority under this Act and the landowner regarding   SB1697 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1    the value of the damage to the productive capability of 2    the soil, the applicant who has been granted a certificate 3    of authority under this Act and the landowner shall 4    consult with a representative of the soil and water 5    conservation district in the respective county where the 6    parcel of property is located for recommendations to 7    restore the productive capability of the soil; and8        (4) compensation for damage to surface and subsurface 9    drainage, including, but not limited to:10            (A) compensation in that the applicant who has 11        been granted a certificate of authority under this Act 12        shall perform immediate and temporary repairs for 13        damage that occurs to subsurface drainage tiles that 14        have water actively flowing through them at the time 15        of damage; and16            (B) compensation such that the applicant who has 17        been granted a certificate of authority under this Act 18        shall compensate the affected landowner to permanently 19        restore drainage to the condition of the drainage 20        prior to accessing the property.21    (b) The compensation for damages required by subsection 22(a) shall be paid in any manner mutually agreed upon by the 23applicant who has been granted a certificate of authority 24under this Act and the affected landowners. Unless otherwise 25agreed, the applicant who has been granted a certificate of 26authority under this Act shall tender to the landowner payment   SB1697 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1by check or draft no later than 60 days after completing the 2required activities under the application if the occurrence or 3value of damages is not disputed. The landowner's remedy for 4unpaid or disputed compensation shall be an action for damages 5in any court of competent jurisdiction for the parcel of 6property or the greater part thereof on which the activities 7were conducted, and the landowner shall be entitled to recover 8reasonable damages and attorney's fees if the landowner 9prevails.10    (c) If any landowner prevails in litigation seeking 11compensation for damages under this Section, the applicant who 12has been granted a certificate of authority under this Act 13shall be responsible for such reasonable attorney's fees and 14costs as the court may allow and a judgment may be entered 15therefor in favor of the plaintiff if the attorney's fees and 16costs are not paid as provided by the court.17    (d) Nothing in this Section shall have any impact on an 18applicant's fulfillment of the requirement to enter into an 19agreement with the Department of Agriculture that governs the 20mitigation of agricultural impacts associated with the 21construction of the proposed pipeline as detailed in paragraph 22(6) of subsection (b) of Section 20. An applicant shall comply 23with the requirements of the agreement that governs the 24mitigation of agricultural impacts as detailed in paragraph 25(6) of subsection (b) of Section 20.   SB1697 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1    Section 10. The Safety and Aid for the Environment in 2Carbon Capture and Sequestration Act is amended by changing 3Section 15 as follows: 4    (415 ILCS 185/15)5    Sec. 15. Integration and unitization of ownership 6interests.7    (a) If at least 2 pore space owners own pore space located 8within a proposed sequestration facility, the owners may agree 9to integrate the owners' interests to develop the pore space 10as a proposed sequestration facility for the underground 11sequestration of carbon dioxide.12    (b) If all of the pore space owners within a proposed or 13permitted sequestration facility do not agree to integrate the 14pore space owners' interests, the sequestration operator may 15petition the Department of Natural Resources to issue an order 16requiring the pore space owners to integrate their interests 17and authorizing the sequestration operator or sequestration 18facility permit holder to develop and use the integrated pore 19space as a sequestration facility for carbon sequestration. 20Such an order for unitization and integration of pore space 21may only be issued if the sequestration operator has obtained 22the rights from pore space owners of pore space underlying at 23least 75% of the surface area above the proposed sequestration 24facility. The petition shall include, but is not limited to:25        (1) the name and address of the petitioners;  SB1697 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1        (2) the property index numbers or legal descriptions 2    for the parcels of property and a geologic description of 3    the pore space within the proposed or permitted 4    sequestration facility;5        (3) a disclosure of any parcels of property overlying 6    the pore space to be integrated, identified by property 7    index numbers or legal descriptions, in which the 8    applicant, any of its owners, officers, corporate 9    subsidiaries, or parents, sister companies, or affiliates, 10    at the time of submission of the application or within 10 11    years prior to the submission of the application, have or 12    had any real or personal interest, whether direct or 13    indirect;14        (4) the names and addresses of all pore space owners 15    owning property within the proposed or permitted 16    sequestration facility as disclosed by the records of the 17    office of the recorder for the county or counties in which 18    the proposed or permitted sequestration facility is 19    situated and a list of consenting and nonconsenting pore 20    space owners, as well as a list of all properties for which 21    a pore space owner is unknown or nonlocatable;22        (5) a statement that the petitioner has exercised due 23    diligence to locate each pore space owner and to seek an 24    agreement with each for pore space rights for the 25    sequestration facility, including a description of the 26    good faith efforts taken to identify, contact, and   SB1697 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1    negotiate with each nonconsenting pore space owner;2        (6) a statement of the type of operations for the 3    proposed or permitted sequestration facility;4        (7) a plan for determining the quantity of pore space 5    sequestration capacity to be assigned to each separately 6    owned parcel of property based on the surface area acreage 7    overlying the proposed or permitted sequestration facility 8    and for using the surface for Class VI well permit 9    required activities under Section 35;10        (8) the method by which pore space owners will be 11    compensated for use of the pore space, and a copy of all 12    agreements entered into with consenting pore space owners 13    regarding the compensation paid to a consenting pore space 14    owner;15        (9) the method by which nonconsenting pore space 16    owners will receive just compensation; and17        (10) a nonrefundable application fee of $250,000.18    The application fee shall be deposited into the Oil and 19Gas Resource Management Fund for the Department of Natural 20Resources' costs related to administration of this Act.21    (c) If the petition for a unitization order concerns 22unknown or nonlocatable pore space owners, the applicant shall 23provide public notice once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in 24the newspaper of the largest circulation in each county in 25which the proposed sequestration facility is located within 30 26days prior to submission of the petition for a unitization and   SB1697 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1integration order. The petitioner shall file proof of such 2notice with the Department of Natural Resources with the 3petition. The petitioner shall also provide public notice of 4the public hearing described in subsection (d) in the same 5manner within 30 days prior to the hearing on the petition for 6a unitization order. The petitioner shall also send notice of 7the filing of the petition and the notice of the public hearing 8via certified mail to the last known address of each 9nonlocatable pore space owner and provide copies of those 10notices to the Department of Natural Resources. The notice 11shall:12        (1) state that a petition for a unitization and 13    integration order has been filed with the Department of 14    Natural Resources;15        (2) describe the formation or formations and pore 16    space proposed to be unitized;17        (3) in the case of an unknown pore space owner, 18    indicate the name of the last known pore space owner;19        (4) in the case of a nonlocatable pore space owner, 20    identify the pore space owner and the owner's last known 21    address; and22        (5) state that any person claiming an interest in the 23    properties proposed to be unitized should notify the 24    operator of the proposed sequestration facility at the 25    published address within 20 days of the publication date.26    Unknown or nonlocatable pore space owners that have not   SB1697 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1claimed an interest by the time of the Department of Natural 2Resources' public notice in subsection (d) shall be deemed to 3have consented to unitization and integration of their pore 4space.5    (d) Prior to issuing an order to unitize and integrate 6pore space, the Department of Natural Resources shall issue a 7public notice of the petition and shall hold a public hearing 8on the petition. The public notice shall include copies of the 9petition and all included attachments that are not protected 10under the Freedom of Information Act. The public notice shall 11include an opportunity for public comments and shall contain 12the date, time, and location of the public hearing as decided 13by the Department. At the public hearing, the Department shall 14allow interested persons to present views and comments on the 15petition. The hearings must be open to the public and recorded 16by stenographic or mechanical means. The Department of Natural 17Resources will make available on its website copies of all 18comments received.19    (e) The Department of Natural Resources shall issue an 20order unitizing and integrating pore space under subsection 21(b) within 60 days after the hearing upon a showing that:22        (1) the petitioner has obtained a Class VI well permit 23    or, if the well permit application is still pending at 24    least one year from the date the petition has been filed, 25    that the petitioner has received a Finding of 26    Administrative Completeness from the United States   SB1697 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1    Environmental Protection Agency;2        (2) the petitioner has made a good faith effort to 3    seek an agreement with all pore space owners located 4    within the proposed or permitted sequestration facility;5        (3) the petitioner has obtained the rights from pore 6    space owners of at least 75% of the surface area above the 7    proposed sequestration facility; and8        (4) all nonconsenting pore space owners have received 9    or will receive just compensation for use of the pore 10    space and use of the surface for Class VI well permit 11    required activities. Additionally, a nonconsenting pore 12    space owner's such compensation shall be no less than the 13    average total payment package, considered as a whole with 14    respect to an individual owner, provided in agreements 15    during the previous 365 days to similarly situated 16    consenting pore space owners for use of their pore space 17    by the same sequestration operator for the same 18    sequestration project. The nonconsenting pore space 19    owner's compensation shall include just compensation and 20    any operations term or injection term payments made upon 21    or after the initiation of injection provided to 22    consenting pore space owners in consideration of allowing 23    use of their pore space for sequestration of carbon 24    dioxide, but Such compensation shall exclude any 25    incentives, such as signing bonuses, provided to 26    consenting pore space owners prior to the initiation of   SB1697 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1    injection. Such compensation shall include any operations 2    term or injection term payments made upon or after the 3    initiation of injection provided to consenting pore space 4    owners in consideration of allowing use of their pore 5    space for sequestration of carbon dioxide. In determining 6    if pore space owners are similarly situated, the 7    Department of Natural Resources shall take into account: 8    the size, location, and proximity of the pore space; the 9    geologic characteristics of the pore space; the 10    restrictions on the use of the surface; the actual use of 11    the surface; the relevant law applicable at the time the 12    consenting pore space agreement was signed; title defects 13    and title warranties; the proximity of the pore space 14    owners' property to any carbon sequestration 15    infrastructure on the surface; whether the injection 16    interferes with any known mineral rights; and the fair 17    market value of pore space when entering into a commercial 18    contract. When evaluating the compensation provided to a 19    similarly situated pore space owner, the Department of 20    Natural Resources shall exclude any compensation provided 21    to a pore space owner of a property identified by the 22    applicant in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) and any 23    compensation that was not provided as part of an arm's 24    length transaction.25        Unknown or nonlocatable pore space owners shall also 26    receive just compensation in the same manner as provided   SB1697 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1    to the other nonconsenting pore space owners that must be 2    held in a separate escrow account for 20 years for future 3    payment to the previously unknown or nonlocatable pore 4    space owner upon discovery of that owner. After 20 years, 5    the compensation shall be transferred to the State 6    Treasurer under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property 7    Act.8    (f) The Department of Natural Resources' order for 9unitization and integration of pore space under this Section 10is not effective until the petitioner has been issued a Class 11VI well permit from the United States Environmental Protection 12Agency and the carbon sequestration permit from the Illinois 13Environmental Protection Agency.14    (g) An order for integration and unitization under this 15Section shall: provide for the unitization of the pore space 16identified in the petition; authorize the integration of pore 17space of nonconsenting pore space owners in the pore space 18identified; provide for who may unitize the pore space to 19establish a sequestration facility to be permitted by the 20Illinois Environmental Protection Agency; and make provision 21for payment of just compensation to nonconsenting pore space 22owner under the integration order. 23    (h) A petitioner shall provide a copy of any order for 24unitization and integration of pore space to the Illinois 25Environmental Protection Agency.26    (i) If groundwater monitoring required by a Class VI   SB1697 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1permit indicates that the source of drinking water has been 2rendered unsafe to drink or to provide to livestock, the 3sequestration operator shall provide an alternate supply of 4potable drinking water within 24 hours of the monitoring 5results becoming available and an alternate supply of water 6that is safe for other uses necessary within 30 days of the 7monitoring results becoming available. The alternate supplies 8of both potable water and water that is safe for other uses 9shall continue until additional monitoring by the 10sequestration operator shows that the water is safe for 11drinking and other uses.12    (j) After an order for unitization and integration of pore 13space is issued, the petitioner shall request that the 14Department of Natural Resources issue separate orders 15establishing the amount of just compensation to be provided to 16each nonconsenting pore space owner. When submitting this 17request, the petitioner shall provide information 18demonstrating the good faith efforts taken to negotiate an 19agreement with the nonconsenting pore space owner, including, 20but not limited to, the number and extent of the petitioner's 21contacts with the pore space owner, whether the petitioner 22explained the compensation offer to the pore space owner, 23whether the compensation offer was comparable to similarly 24situated pore space owners, what efforts were made to address 25the pore space owner's concerns, and the likelihood that 26further negotiations would be successful. All orders requiring   SB1697 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1the provision of just compensation shall be made after notice 2and hearing in which the Department of Natural Resources shall 3determine the appropriate amount of just compensation to be 4provided to each nonconsenting pore space owner as described 5in this Section. The Department shall adopt reasonable rules 6governing such hearings as may be necessary. In such a 7hearing, the burden shall be on the petitioner to prove the 8appropriate amount of just compensation consistent with this 9Section. Both the petitioner and the pore space owner shall be 10permitted to provide testimony and evidence regarding the 11appropriateness of the amount of just compensation proposed by 12the sequestration operator. An order by the Department of 13Natural Resources establishing the appropriate amount of just 14compensation to be provided to a nonconsenting pore space 15owner shall be a final agency decision subject to judicial 16review under the Administrative Review Law. Such proceedings 17for judicial review may be commenced in the circuit court of 18the county in which any part of the pore space is situated. The 19Department of Natural Resources shall not be required to 20certify any record to the court or file any answer in court or 21otherwise appear in any court in a judicial review proceeding, 22unless there is filed in the court with the complaint a receipt 23from the Department of Natural Resources acknowledging payment 24of the costs of furnishing and certifying the record. Failure 25on the part of the plaintiff to file such receipt in court 26shall be grounds for dismissal of the action.   SB1697 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09225 AAS 19282 b1(Source: P.A. 103-651, eff. 7-18-24.)